Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
PART 1
GENERAL

35-75-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Agricultural Development Authority Act".

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1731, § 1, effective June 19.

35-75-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The high cost and lack of available agricultural loans for farmers and other agricultural enterprises, with the resultant decrease in crop, livestock, and business productivity and resultant inability on the part of farmers and other agricultural enterprises to acquire modern agricultural equipment and processes, makes it difficult for farmers and other agricultural enterprises to maintain their present employment levels or to increase employment and lessens the supply of agricultural commodities available to fulfill the needs of the citizens of this state;

As a result of the continuing increase in the costs of maintaining operations, including costs of construction and rehabilitation, taxes, heating and electricity expenses, maintenance and repair expenses, and the cost of land, the state of Colorado suffers from structural economic weaknesses which contribute to a decline in capital investment, unemployment, and underemployment; and

The insufficiency of gainful employment in rural areas puts additional pressure on the state's welfare, public health, and crime prevention programs.

The general assembly further finds that:

Farm credit and agricultural loan financing is not currently available at interest rates which are consistent with the needs of farmers and other agricultural enterprises;

The problems set forth in this section cannot alone be remedied through the operation of private enterprise but can be alleviated through the creation of an agricultural development authority to encourage the investment of private capital in the agricultural sector through the use of public financing for the purpose of making loans available at interest rates lower than those available in the conventional farm credit markets. Creation of such an agricultural development authority to coordinate and cooperate with farmers and other agricultural enterprises is essential to alleviating these conditions.

Alleviating the conditions and problems set forth in this section by the encouragement of private investment through an agricultural development authority is a public purpose, and public money provided by the sale of revenue bonds may be borrowed, expended, advanced, loaned, and granted for such use. Such activities shall not be conducted for profit and are proper governmental functions best accomplished by the creation of an agricultural development authority vested with the powers and duties specified in this article.

This article is enacted to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the people of this state.

The agricultural development authority created by this article shall make financing available for farmers and other agricultural enterprises to serve those people which private industry is unable to serve.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1731, § 1, effective June 19.

35-75-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Agriculture" or "agricultural enterprise" means the real and personal property constituting farms, ranches, and other agricultural commodity producers, including aquaculture, floriculture, silvaculture, and other agricultural endeavors that the authority wishes to include within the provisions of this article. Such term shall include agricultural land, equipment used in the production and processing of agricultural products, and other capital improvements including, but not limited to, the purchase of livestock and the implementation of soil conservation practices.

"Authority" means the Colorado agricultural development authority created by section 35-75-104.

"Board" means the board of directors of the authority.

"Bond" means any bond, note, debenture, interim certificate, grant and revenue anticipation note, or other evidence of indebtedness authorized to be issued by the authority pursuant to this article.

"Borrower" means an enterprise engaged in agriculture or agricultural processing in Colorado.

"Contracting party" means any party to a lease, sales contract, or loan agreement except the authority.

"Lease" means:

A lease containing an option to purchase an agricultural enterprise for a nominal sum upon payment, in full or with provision for such payment, of all bonds issued in connection with the agricultural enterprise, all interest thereon, and all other expenses in connection with the agricultural enterprise; or

A lease containing an option to purchase an agricultural enterprise at any time, as provided in such lease, upon payment of the purchase price. The purchase price shall be sufficient to pay all bonds issued in connection with the agricultural enterprise, all interest thereon, and all other expenses incurred in connection with the agricultural enterprise, but payment may be made in the form of one or more notes, debentures, bonds, or other secured or unsecured debt obligations of the lessee which provide for timely payments, including, but not limited to, interest thereon sufficient for such purposes and delivered to the authority or to the trustee under the indenture pursuant to which the bonds were issued.

"Lender" means any federal or state chartered bank, federal land bank, production credit association, bank for cooperatives, savings and loan association, building and loan association, small business investment company, or other institution qualified within the state to originate and service loans, including, but not limited to, insurance companies, credit unions, and mortgage loan companies.

"Loan" means any lease, loan agreement, or sale contract entered into with a borrower.

"Loan agreement" means an agreement which provides for the authority or a lender with which the authority has contracted to loan the proceeds derived from the issuance of bonds pursuant to section 35-75-108 to a contracting party to be used to pay the cost of an agricultural enterprise and which provides for the repayment of such loan by the contracting party. Such agreement may provide for the loans to be secured or evidenced by one or more notes, debentures, bonds, or other secured or unsecured debt obligations of the contracting party, delivered to the authority or to the trustee under the indenture pursuant to which the bonds were issued.

"Loan insurer" or "loan guarantor" means an agency, department, administration, or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the federal department of housing and urban development, the farmers home administration of the federal department of agriculture, or the veterans administration of the United States, any private mortgage insurance company, or any other public or private agency which insures or guarantees loans.

"Sale contract" means a contract providing for the sale of an agricultural enterprise to a contracting party and includes a contract providing for payment of the purchase price in one or more installments. If the sale contract permits title to the agricultural enterprise to pass to such contracting party or parties prior to payment in full of the entire purchase price, it shall also provide for such contracting party to deliver to the authority or to the trustee under the indenture pursuant to which the bonds were issued one or more notes, debentures, bonds, or other secured or unsecured debt obligations of the contracting party which provides for timely payments, including, without limitation, interest thereon for the balance of the purchase price at or prior to the passage of such title.

"State" means the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1732, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 2000:

(5) amended, p. 306, § 1, effective April 5.

35-75-104. Colorado agricultural development authority - creation - membership.

There is hereby created an independent public body politic and corporate to be known as the Colorado agricultural development authority. Said authority is constituted a public instrumentality, and its exercise of the powers conferred by this article shall be deemed and held to be the performance of an essential public function. The authority shall be a body corporate and a political subdivision of the state and shall not be an agency of state government and shall not be subject to administrative direction by any department, commission, board, or agency of the state.

The governing body of the authority is a board of directors, which consists of seven members, who are appointed as follows:

One shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate;

Three shall be appointed by the president of the senate; and

Three shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.

Such members must be residents of the state, must have a knowledge of agricultural activity in the state, and must represent the various agriculture operations and geographical regions of the state. No more than four of the appointed members may be affiliated with the same political party.

Members shall be appointed for a term of four years; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than four members' terms expire in the same year. Each member shall serve until the member's successor has been appointed. Any member shall be eligible for reappointment. The person making the original appointment shall fill any vacancy by appointment for the remainder of an unexpired term.

The commissioner of agriculture shall be an ex officio, nonvoting member of the board.

Any appointed member of the board may be removed by the person making the appointment for misfeasance, malfeasance, willful neglect of duty, or other cause.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1734, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 87:

(2)(a) amended, p. 913, § 29, effective June 15.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 81, § 109, effective February 25.

Cross references:

For the provisions that designate the Colorado agricultural development authority as a "special purpose authority" for the purposes of § 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution, see § 24-77-102 (15).

35-75-105. Organization meeting - chairman - personnel - surety bond - conflict of interest.

The member of the board appointed by the governor shall call and convene the initial organizational meeting of the board and shall serve as its chairman pro tempore. At such meeting, appropriate bylaws shall be presented for adoption. The bylaws may provide for the election or appointment of officers, the delegation of certain powers and duties, and such other matters as the authority deems proper. At such meeting, and annually thereafter, the board shall elect one of its members as chairman and one as vice-chairman.

The authority shall appoint an executive officer and such other personnel as it deems necessary, including an associate executive officer, who shall not be members of the board and who shall serve at its pleasure. They shall receive such compensation for their services as determined by the board.

The executive officer, the associate executive officer, or any other person designated by the board shall keep a record of the proceedings of the board and shall be custodian of all books, documents, and papers filed with the board, the minute books or journal of the board, and its official seal. Said executive officer, associate executive officer, or other person may cause copies to be made of all minutes and other records and documents of the board and may give certificates under the official seal of the authority to the effect that such copies are true copies and all persons dealing with the authority may rely on such certificates.

The board may delegate, by resolution, to one or more of its members or to its executive officer or associate executive officer such powers and duties as it may deem proper.

Before the issuance of any bonds under this article, the executive officer and associate executive officer shall each execute a surety bond in the sum of one hundred thousand dollars, and each member of the board shall execute a surety bond in the sum of fifty thousand dollars or, in lieu thereof, the chairman of the board shall execute a blanket bond covering each member of the board, the executive officer, the associate executive officer, and the employees of the authority, each surety bond to be conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties of the office covered, to be executed by a surety authorized to transact business in this state as surety. The cost of each such bond shall be paid by the authority.

No part of the revenues or assets of the authority shall inure to the benefit of, or be distributed to, its members or officers or any other private persons or entities.

The authority and its corporate existence shall continue until terminated by law; except that no such law shall take effect so long as the authority has bonds, notes, or other obligations outstanding, unless adequate provision has been made for the payment thereof. Upon termination of the existence of the authority, all its rights and properties in excess of its obligations shall pass to and be vested in the state.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1734, § 1, effective June 19.

35-75-106. Meetings of board - quorum - expenses.

Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting business and exercising its powers. Action may be taken by the board upon the affirmative vote of at least four of its members. No vacancy in the membership of the board shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the board.

Each meeting of the board for any purpose whatsoever shall be open to the public. Notice of meetings shall be as provided in the bylaws of the authority. Resolutions need not be published or posted, but resolutions and all proceedings and other acts of the board shall be a public record.

Members of the board shall receive no compensation for services but shall be entitled to the necessary expenses, including traveling and lodging expenses, incurred in the discharge of their official duties. Any payments for compensation and expenses shall be paid from funds of the authority.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1735, § 1, effective June 19.

35-75-107. General powers and duties of authority.

In addition to any other powers specifically granted to the authority in this article, the authority has the following powers:

To have perpetual existence and succession as a body politic and corporate;

To adopt and from time to time amend or repeal bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business, consistent with the provisions of this article;

To sue and be sued;

To have and to use a seal and to alter the same at pleasure;

To maintain an office at such place as it may designate;

To borrow money and issue bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes, or other obligations for any of its corporate purposes and to fund or refund such obligations as provided in this article;

To engage the services of private consultants and legal counsel to render professional and technical assistance and advice in carrying out the purposes of this article;

To procure insurance against any loss in connection with its property and other assets, including loans and loan notes, in such amounts and from such insurers as it may deem advisable;

To procure insurance or guarantees from any public or private entity, including any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States, for payment of any bonds issued by the authority, including the power to pay premiums on any such insurance;

To receive and accept from any source aid or contributions of money, property, labor, or other things of value to be held, used, and applied to carry out the purposes of this article subject to the conditions upon which the grants or contributions are made, including, but not limited to, gifts or grants from any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States for any purpose consistent with the provisions of this article;

To enter into agreements with any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States or this state and with lenders;

To enter into loan agreements, sales contracts, and leases with contracting parties for the purpose of planning, regulating, and providing for the financing and refinancing of any agricultural enterprise;

To enter into contracts or agreements with lenders for the servicing and processing of loans;

To provide technical assistance to local public bodies and to profit and nonprofit entities in the development or operation of agricultural enterprises and to distribute data and information concerning the encouragement and improvement of agricultural enterprises and agricultural employment in the state;

To cooperate with and exchange services, personnel, and information with any federal, state, or local governmental agency;

To sell, at public or private sale, with or without public bidding, any loan or other obligation held by the authority;

To the extent permitted under its contract with the holders of bonds of the authority, to consent to any modification with respect to the rate of interest, time and payment of any installment of principal or interest, or any other term of any contract, loan, loan note, loan note commitment, contract, lease, or agreement of any kind to which the authority is a party;

To the extent permitted under its contract with the holders of bonds of the authority, to enter into contracts with any lender containing provisions enabling it to reduce the rental or carrying charges to persons unable to pay the regular schedule of charges where, by reason of other income or payment by any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States or of this state, such reduction can be made without jeopardizing the economic stability of the agricultural enterprise being financed;

To make and execute contracts and all other instruments necessary or convenient for the exercise of its powers and functions under this article;

To do all things necessary and convenient to carry out the purposes of this article;

To receive applications and issue deduction certificates for the income tax deduction for a portion of lease payments received by a qualified taxpayer for leasing the taxpayer's agricultural asset to an eligible beginning farmer or rancher as allowed in sections 39-22-104 and 39-22-304, C.R.S.; except that the authority shall not issue more than one hundred deduction certificates per income tax year. The authority shall require that a copy of the schedule F that the eligible beginning farmer or rancher filed with the eligible beginning farmer's or rancher's federal income tax return be included as a part of the application for a deduction certificate.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1736, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 2016:

(1)(u) added, (HB 16-1194), ch. 252, p. 1033, § 3, effective August 10.

35-75-108. Authority - loans to or made by lenders.

The authority may:

Make, and undertake commitments to make, loans to lenders under terms and conditions requiring the proceeds thereof to be used by such lenders to make loans to finance agricultural enterprises. Loan commitments or actual loans shall be originated through and serviced by any bank, trust company, savings and loan association, mortgage banker, or other financial institution authorized to transact business in this state.

Invest in, purchase or make commitments to invest in or purchase, or take assignments or make commitments to take assignments of loans made by lenders for the construction, rehabilitation, or purchase of agricultural enterprises. No loan shall be eligible for investment in, purchase, or assignment by the authority if the loan was made more than six months prior to the date of investment, purchase, or assignment by the authority.

Prior to exercising any of the powers authorized in subsection (1) of this section, the authority shall require the lender to certify and agree that:

The loan is, or if the loan has not yet been made will at the time of making be, in all respects a prudent investment; and

Such lender will use the proceeds of the loan, investment, sale, or assignment within a reasonable period of time to make loans or purchase loans to finance agricultural enterprises; or, if such lender has made a commitment to make loans to finance agricultural enterprises on the basis of a commitment from the authority to purchase such loans, such lender will make and sell the loans to the authority within a reasonable period of time.

Prior to exercising any of the powers under subsection (1) of this section, the authority may, but is not obligated to:

Require that the loan involved be insured by a loan insurer or be guaranteed by a loan guarantor;

Require any type of security that it deems reasonable and necessary; or

Authorize the reservation of funds by lenders in such amount and subject to such conditions as the authority considers reasonable and necessary.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1737, § 1, effective June 19.

35-75-109. Authority - rules and regulations.

Prior to exercising its authority under section 35-75-108 (1), the authority shall promulgate rules and regulations governing its activities authorized under this article, including, but not limited to:

Procedures for the submission of requests or invitations and proposals for making loans to lenders and procedures for the investment in, purchase, assignment, and sale of loans;

Procedures for reinvestment by lenders of the proceeds, or an equivalent amount, from any loan to lenders and procedures for the investment in or purchase by the authority of loans or the assignment or sale to the authority of loans to finance agricultural enterprises;

The number of agricultural projects, location of the projects, and other characteristics of agricultural enterprises to be financed directly or indirectly by the authority pursuant to section 35-75-108 (1), including, to the extent reasonably possible, assurance that the agricultural enterprises to be financed by an issue of bonds or series of issues will improve employment conditions or otherwise enhance the welfare of persons in the agricultural sector;

Rates, fees, charges, and other terms and conditions of originating or servicing loans in order to protect against an excessive financial return or benefit by the originator or servicer;

The type and amount of collateral or security to be provided to assure repayment of loans made by the authority;

The type of collateral, payment bonds, performance bonds, or other security to be provided for any loans made by a lender for construction loans;

The nature and amount of fees to be charged by the authority to provide for expenses and reserves of the authority;

Standards and requirements for the allocation of available money among lenders and the determination of the maturities, terms, conditions, and interest rates for loans made, purchased, sold, assigned, or committed pursuant to this article;

Commitment requirements for agricultural financing by lenders involving money provided directly or indirectly by the authority; or

Any other matters related to the duties or exercise of the authority's powers or duties under this article.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1738, § 1, effective June 19.

35-75-110. Notes.

The authority may issue from time to time its negotiable notes for any corporate purpose and may renew from time to time any notes by the issuance of new notes, whether the notes to be renewed have or have not matured. The authority may issue notes partly to renew notes or to discharge other obligations then outstanding and partly for any other purpose. The notes may be authorized, sold, executed, and delivered in the same manner as bonds.

Any resolution authorizing notes of the authority or any issue of such notes may contain any provisions which the authority is authorized to include in any resolution authorizing bonds of the authority or any issue of bonds, and the authority may include in any notes any terms, covenants, or conditions which it is authorized to include in any bonds.

All such notes shall be payable from the proceeds of bonds or renewal notes or from the revenues of the authority or other moneys available for such payment and not otherwise pledged, subject only to any contractual rights of the holders of any of its notes or other obligations outstanding at the time of issuance of such notes.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1738, § 1, effective June 19.

35-75-111. Bonds.

The authority may issue from time to time its bonds in such principal amounts as the authority determines to be necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving any of its corporate purposes.

In anticipation of the sale of such bonds, the authority may issue bond anticipation notes and may renew the same from time to time. Such notes shall be paid from any revenues of the authority or other moneys available for payments and not otherwise pledged or from the proceeds of the sale of the bonds of the authority in anticipation of which they were issued. The bond anticipation notes shall be issued in the same manner as bonds. Such notes and the resolution authorizing them may contain any provisions, conditions, or limitations which a bond resolution of the authority may contain.

Bonds may be issued as serial bonds, as term bonds, or as a combination of both types. All bonds issued by the authority shall be payable solely out of the revenues and receipts of the authority as designated in the resolution of the authority under which the bonds are authorized to be issued or as designated in a trust indenture authorized by the authority.

Bonds may be executed and delivered by the authority at such times, may be in such form and denominations and include such terms and maturities, may be in fully registered form or in bearer form registerable either as to principal or interest or both, may bear such conversion privileges, may be payable in such installments and at such time or times not exceeding forty years from the date thereof, may be payable at such place or places whether within or without the state of Colorado, may bear interest at such rate or rates per annum as determined by the authority without regard to any interest rate limitation appearing in any other law of this state, may be evidenced in such manner, may be executed by such officers of the authority, including the use of one or more facsimile signatures so long as at least one manual signature appears on the bonds, which may be either an officer of the authority or an officer of the trustee authenticating the same, may be in the form of coupon bonds which have attached interest coupons bearing the facsimile signature of an authorized officer of the authority, and may contain such provisions not inconsistent with this article all as provided in the resolution of the authority under which the bonds are authorized to be issued or as provided in a trust indenture authorized by the authority.

If deemed advisable by the authority, there may be retained in the resolution or the trust indenture under which any bonds of the authority are authorized to be issued an option to redeem all or any part of said bonds as may be specified in such resolution or in such trust indenture, at such price or prices, after such notice or notices, and on such terms and conditions as may be set forth in such resolution or in such trust indenture and as may be briefly recited on the face of the bonds. Nothing in this article shall be construed to confer on the authority the right or option to redeem any bonds except as provided in such resolution or in such trust indenture under which they are issued.

The bonds or notes of the authority may be sold at public or private sale for such price or prices, in such manner, and at such times as determined by the authority, and the authority may pay all expenses, premiums, and commissions which it may deem necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance of bonds or notes. The power to fix the date of sale of bonds and notes, to receive bids or proposals, to award and sell bonds and notes, and to take all other necessary action to sell and deliver bonds and notes may be delegated to the executive officer by resolution of the authority. Pending preparation of the definitive bonds, the authority may issue interim receipts or certificates which shall be exchanged for such definitive bonds.

Any outstanding bonds of the authority may be refunded or advance refunded at any time and from time to time by the authority by the issuance of its bonds for such purpose in a principal amount determined by the authority, which may include interest accrued or to accrue with or without giving effect to investment income and other expenses necessary to be paid in connection with such issuance.

Any such refunding may be effected whether the bonds to be refunded have then matured or will mature thereafter, either by sale of the refunding bonds and the application of the proceeds of such sale for the payment of the bonds to be refunded or by the exchange of the refunding bonds for the bonds to be refunded with the consent of the holders of the bonds to be so refunded, regardless of whether or not the bonds proposed to be refunded are payable on the same date or different dates or are due serially or otherwise.

The proceeds of any such bonds issued for the purpose of refunding outstanding bonds may be applied, in the discretion of the authority, to the purchase or retirement at maturity or redemption of such outstanding bonds either on their earliest or any subsequent redemption dates or upon the purchase or at the maturity thereof and, pending such application, may be placed in escrow to be applied to such purchase or retirement at maturity or redemption on such dates as may be determined by the authority. Any such escrowed proceeds, pending such use, may be invested or deposited in securities or depositories meeting the requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., maturing at such time or times as are appropriate to assure the prompt payment as to principal, interest, and redemption premium, if any, of the outstanding bonds to be so refunded. The interest, income, and profit, if any, earned or realized on any such investment may also be applied, in the discretion of the authority, to the payment of the outstanding bonds or notes to be so refunded or to the payment of principal and interest on the refunding bonds or for any other purpose under this article. After the terms of the escrow have been fully satisfied and carried out, any balance of such proceeds and interest, income, and profits, if any, earned or realized on the investments may be returned to the authority for use by it in any lawful manner.

All such refunding bonds shall be subject to the provisions of this article in the same manner and to the same extent as other bonds issued pursuant to this article.

The proceeds of any bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes, or other obligations may be used and applied to the payment of financing costs, including legal, underwriting and investment banking, accounting, and other similar costs; the funding of any reserve funds deemed necessary or advisable by the authority; interest on such bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes, or other obligations for a period not to exceed three years; and all other necessary and incidental costs and expenses.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1739, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 89:

(5)(b)(II) amended, p. 1112, § 49, effective July 1.

35-75-111.5. Issuance of bonds to construct renewable energy generation facilities and electric transmission lines - renewable energy cooperatives.

To facilitate the transmission of electricity generated by a renewable energy cooperative established pursuant to section 7-56-210, C.R.S., the authority may issue revenue bonds in amounts sufficient to pay the following described costs of construction, upgrading, and acquisition, including any required interest on the bonds during construction, upgrading, and acquisition, plus all amounts required for the costs of bond issuance and any required reserves on the bonds:

Construction of renewable energy generation facilities;

Construction or upgrading of electric transmission lines and appurtenances to be used for the transfer of electricity at one hundred fifteen kilovolts or greater;

Acquisition of the right-of-way on which renewable energy generation facilities or electric transmission lines and appurtenances to be used for the transfer of electricity at one hundred fifteen kilovolts or greater are to be constructed; and

Construction or upgrading of electric distribution lines and appurtenances to be used to connect renewable resources or technologies to electric transmission lines and appurtenances.

Revenue bonds, and interest thereon, issued pursuant to this section shall be payable from revenues derived from use of the renewable energy generation facilities or electric transmission lines constructed, upgraded, or acquired through the use of bond proceeds.

Revenue bonds, including refunding revenue bonds, issued hereunder shall not constitute an indebtedness of the state, nor shall they constitute indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision limiting the incurring of indebtedness.

The proceeds of bonds, revenues, and receipts derived from the construction, upgrading, or acquisition activities described in this section that are financed in whole or in part by the bonds, and interest and income earned on the deposit and investment of such proceeds, revenues, and receipts, shall not be included in state fiscal year spending for purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution and article 77 of title 24, C.R.S.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing the contracting by the state of a debt or loan in any form, nor the pledging of the general taxes of the state. Revenue bonds issued pursuant to this section shall not be construed to be moral obligation bonds. The owners or holders of such bonds shall not look to any other revenues of the state for the payment of the bonds; shall not look to any legal, equitable, or moral obligation on the part of the state to pay any portion of the bonds; and shall not look to the state general fund or any other fund of the state for the payment of principal or interest of such obligation.

Revenue bonds, including refunding revenue bonds, issued hereunder and the income derived therefrom shall be exempt from all state, county, and municipal taxation in the state, except Colorado estate taxes.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1122, § 3, effective May 27.

35-75-112. Negotiability of bonds.

All bonds and the interest coupons applicable to such bonds are hereby declared and shall be construed to be negotiable instruments.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1741, § 1, effective June 19.

35-75-113. Security for bonds and notes.

The principal and interest on any bonds or notes issued by the authority may be secured by a trust indenture by and between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank located within or without this state having trust powers. Such trust indenture or the resolution providing for the issuance of such obligations may pledge or assign all or any part of the revenues or assets of the authority, including, without limitation, temporary loans, contracts, agreements, and other security or investment obligations, the fees or charges made or received by the authority, and any other moneys received or due to be received by the authority.

Such trust indenture or resolution may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the holders of any of the bonds or notes as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the authority in relation to the purposes to which proceeds of the bonds or notes may be applied, the disposition or pledging of the revenues or assets of the authority, the terms and conditions for the issuance of additional bonds or notes, and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys. Any such trust indenture or resolution may set forth the rights and remedies of the holders of any bonds or notes and of the trustee and may restrict the individual right of action by any such holders.

In addition any such trust indenture or resolution may contain such other provision as the authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the holders of any bonds or notes. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such indenture or resolution may be paid from the revenues or assets pledged or assigned to the payment of the principal of and the interest on bonds or notes or from any other funds available to the authority.

Any pledge made by the authority shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made. The revenues and moneys so pledged and thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to lien of such pledge without any physical delivery or further act, and the lien of such pledge shall be valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice of such lien. Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded. Each pledge, agreement, and indenture made for the benefit or security of any of the bonds of the authority shall continue to be effective until the principal of and interest on the bonds for the benefit of which the same are made has been fully paid or provision for such payment duly made.

In the event of default in any such payment or in any agreements of the authority made as part of the contract under which the bonds were issued, whether contained in the resolutions authorizing the bonds or in any trust indenture executed as security for such bonds, said payment or agreement may be enforced by suit, mandamus, or either of such remedies.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1741, § 1, effective June 19.

35-75-114. Personal liability.

Neither the members of the board, employees of the authority, nor any person executing the bonds or notes shall be liable personally on bonds or notes or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1742, § 1, effective June 19.

35-75-115. Purchase.

The authority may purchase its bonds or notes out of any available funds. The authority may hold, pledge, cancel, or resell such bonds or notes, subject to and in accordance with agreements with bondholders or noteholders.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1742, § 1, effective June 19.